Utah statutes.
78A-11-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Commission" means the Judicial Conduct Commission established by Utah Constitution Article VIII, Section 13 and this chapter.

(2) (a)  "Complaint" includes:

(i)  a written complaint against a judge; or

(ii)  an allegation based on reliable information received in any form, from any source, that alleges, or from which a reasonable inference can be drawn that a judge is in violation of any provision of Utah Constitution Article VIII, Section 13.

(b)  "Complaint" does not include an allegation initiated by the commission or its staff.

(3)  "Investigation" means an inquiry into an allegation of misconduct, including a search for and examination of evidence concerning the allegations, which begins upon the receipt of a complaint and is completed when either the complaint is dismissed by a majority vote of the commission or when an order is sent to the Supreme Court for its review in accordance with Utah Constitution Article VIII, Section 13.

(4) "Judge" includes the chief justice of the Supreme Court, a justice of the Supreme Court, an appellate court judge, a district court judge, an active senior judge, a juvenile court judge, a justice court judge, an active senior justice court judge, and a judge pro tempore of any court of this state.

